Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.672

[Art. 88] Contempt towards officials.

Any person subject to this code who uses contemptuous words against the president, the governor, or the governor of any other state, territory, commonwealth, or possession in which that person may be serving, shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 87.]